North Dakota, session 69, HB1389.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATIVE ASSEMBLY OF NORTH DAKOTA:
SECTION 1. AMENDMENT. Section 11-11-55.1 of the North Dakota Century Code is
amended and reenacted as follows:
11-11-55.1. Petition or resolution for improvements - Levy of special assessments -
Levy of infrastructure fee.
1. The board of county commissioners of any county, by resolution or upon receipt of a
petition of sixty percent of the landowners in a defined area, outside of the limits of any
incorporated city, may install the petitioned improvements as benefit the defined area,
provide for the financing of the improvements, and levy special assessments for the
payment of all or part of the improvements within the defined area.
2. The board of county commissioners, by resolution or upon petition of sixty percent of
the qualified electors who voted in the last general election in a defined area, may levy
and collect an infrastructure fee in lieu of general special assessments on all
residential and commercial county utility bills for payment of infrastructure
maintenance costs. If a home rule county levies an infrastructure fee, the home rule
county also may levy and collect green field special assessments.
3. In providing for the improvements, the county shall have the authority granted to
municipalities in chapters 40-22, 40-23, 40-23.1, 40-24, 40-25, 40-26, 40-27, and
40-28, and the county shall comply with the provisions of those chapters in making the
Page No. 1 25.1051.02000

Sixty-ninth
Legislative Assembly
improvements. Whenever action is required of city officials in those chapters, the
comparable county officials shall take the action.
4. A county proposing a project to be funded by an infrastructure fee under this section
shall create an infrastructure zone within the county for each proposed project.
5. The county shall mail to each utility account holder within the proposed infrastructure
zone a notice of the proposed zone. The notice must include:
a. The total cost of the proposed project;
b. A description of the proposed project;
c. The date and time of a public hearing on the proposed project; and
d. A form on which the utility account holder may protest the fee, stating the
deadline for a protest, which may not be fewer than thirty days from the date of
the notice.
6. A county proposing a project to be funded by an infrastructure fee under this section
shall hold a public hearing on the project. The public hearing must take place no
earlier than fourteen days after the date of the notice, and before the deadline for the
submission of protest forms.
7. If a county receives protest forms from a majority of utility account holders in a
proposed zone the city may not proceed with the project in the proposed zone.
8. The county may begin a project after the time to protest has passed.
9. The rate of the fee assessed to commercial property under this section may not be
more than two times the rate assessed to residential property.
10. If a home rule county levies an infrastructure fee, the home rule county also may levy
and collect green field special assessments.
11. As used in this section:
a. "General special assessments" means special assessments levied for the
purpose of maintaining existing roads and infrastructure and special
assessments levied for the construction or repair of arterial roads and
infrastructure that provide a benefit to the entire community.
b. "Green field special assessments" means special assessments levied for
infrastructure costs associated with the development of agricultural or
undeveloped property.
Page No. 2 25.1051.02000

Sixty-ninth
Legislative Assembly
SECTION 2. AMENDMENT. Section 40-22-01.3 of the North Dakota Century Code is
amended and reenacted as follows:
40-22-01.3. Power of municipality to defray expense of improvements - Infrastructure
fee.
1. Notwithstanding section 40-22-01, a municipality may levy and collect an infrastructure
fee. The fee must replace a general special assessment on all property for payment of
infrastructure maintenance costs through a utility bill issued by a municipality. The
money collected under this subsection may not be used for any purpose other than
infrastructure maintenance costs. If a municipality levies an infrastructure fee, the
municipality also may levy and collect green field special assessments.
2. A city proposing a project to be funded by an infrastructure fee under this section shall
create an infrastructure zone within the city for each proposed project.
3. The city shall mail to each utility account holder within the proposed infrastructure
zone a notice of the proposed zone. The notice must include:
a. The total cost of the proposed project;
b. A description of the proposed project;
c. The date and time of a public hearing on the proposed project; and
d. A form on which the utility account holder may protest the fee, stating the
deadline for a protest, which may not be fewer than thirty days from the date of
the notice.
4. A city proposing a project to be funded by an infrastructure fee under this section shall
hold a public hearing on the project. The public hearing must take place no earlier than
fourteen days after the date of the notice, and before the deadline for the submission
of protest forms.
5. If a city receives protest forms from a majority of utility account holders in a proposed
zone the city may not proceed with the project in the proposed zone.
6. The city may begin a project after the time to protest has passed.
7. The rate of the fee assessed to commercial property under this section may not be
more than two times the rate assessed to residential property.
8. If a municipality levies an infrastructure fee, the municipality also may levy and collect
green field special assessments.
Page No. 3 25.1051.02000

Sixty-ninth
Legislative Assembly
9. As used in this section:
a. "General special assessments" means special assessments levied for the
purpose of maintaining existing roads and infrastructure and special
assessments levied for the construction or repair of arterial roads and
infrastructure that provide a benefit to the entire community.
b. "Green field special assessments" means special assessments levied for
infrastructure costs associated with the development of agricultural or
undeveloped property.
SECTION 3. AMENDMENT. Section 57-15-41 of the North Dakota Century Code is
amended and reenacted as follows:
57-15-41. Political subdivision tax levies for payment of special assessments exempt
from levy limitations.
No taxTax levy limitations provided by any statute of this state may not apply to tax levies by
any county, city, school district, park district, or township for the purpose of paying any special
assessments and any infrastructure fee provided in sections 11 - 09.1 - 05, 11 - 11 - 55.1 ,
40 - 05.1 - 06, and 40 - 22 - 01.3 or paying debt service on bonds issued to prepay special
assessments made in accordance with the provisions of title 40, against property owned by
such county, city, school district, park district, or township. Any surplus in the special
assessment fund after all of the special assessments for which the fund was created have been
paid shall be placed in the general fund of the political subdivision.
Page No. 4 25.1051.02000